Alabama, session 2026rs, SB17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
SB17 INTRODUCED
29 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
30 the "Child Predator Death Penalty Act."
31 Section 2. Sections 13A-5-40, 13A-6-61, 13A-6-63, and
32 13A-6-65.1, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
33 follows:
34 "§13A-5-40
35 (a) The following are capital offenses:
36 (1) Murder by the defendant during a kidnapping in the
37 first degree or an attempt thereof committed by the defendant.
38 (2) Murder by the defendant during a robbery in the
39 first degree or an attempt thereof committed by the defendant.
40 (3) Murder by the defendant during a rape in the first
41 or second degree or an attempt thereof committed by the
42 defendant; or murder by the defendant during sodomy in the
43 first or second degree or an attempt thereof committed by the
44 defendant.
45 (4) Murder by the defendant during a burglary in the
46 first or second degree or an attempt thereof committed by the
47 defendant.
48 (5) Murder of any police officer, sheriff, deputy,
49 state trooper, federal law enforcement officer, or any other
50 state or federal peace officer of any kind, or prison or jail
51 guard, while the officer or guard is on duty, regardless of
52 whether the defendant knew or should have known the victim was
53 an officer or guard on duty, or because of some official or
54 job-related act or performance of the officer or guard.
55 (6) Murder committed while the defendant is under
56 sentence of life imprisonment.
Page 2

sentence of life imprisonment.
SB17 INTRODUCED
57 (7) Murder done for a pecuniary or other valuable
58 consideration or pursuant to a contract or for hire.
59 (8) Murder by the defendant during sexual abuse in the
60 first or second degree or an attempt thereof committed by the
61 defendant.
62 (9) Murder by the defendant during arson in the first
63 or second degree committed by the defendant; or murder by the
64 defendant by means of explosives or explosion.
65 (10) Murder wherein two or more persons are murdered by
66 the defendant by one act or pursuant to one scheme or course
67 of conduct.
68 (11) Murder by the defendant when the victim is a state
69 or federal public official or former public official and the
70 murder stems from or, is caused by, or is related to his or
71 her official position, act, or capacity.
72 (12) Murder by the defendant during the act of
73 unlawfully assuming control of any aircraft by use of threats
74 or force with intent to obtain any valuable consideration for
75 the release of the aircraft or any passenger or crewmen
76 crewmember thereon, to direct the route or movement of the
77 aircraft, or otherwise exert control over the aircraft.
78 (13) Murder by a defendant who has been convicted of
79 any other murder in the 20 years preceding the crime;
80 provided, that the murder which that constitutes the capital
81 crime shall be murder as defined in subsection (b); and
82 provided further that the prior murder conviction referred to
83 shall include murder in any degree as defined at the time and
84 place of the prior conviction.
Page 3

place of the prior conviction.
SB17 INTRODUCED
85 (14) Murder when the victim is subpoenaed, or has been
86 subpoenaed, to testify, or the victim had testified, in any
87 preliminary hearing, grand jury proceeding, criminal trial or
88 criminal proceeding of whatever nature, or civil trial or
89 civil proceeding of whatever nature, in any municipal, state,
90 or federal court, when the murder stems from, is caused by, or
91 is related to the capacity or role of the victim as a witness.
92 (15) Murder when the victim is less than fourteen 14
93 years of age.
94 (16) Murder committed by or through the use of a deadly
95 weapon fired or otherwise used from outside a dwelling while
96 the victim is in a dwelling.
97 (17) Murder committed by or through the use of a deadly
98 weapon while the victim is in a vehicle.
99 (18) Murder committed by or through the use of a deadly
100 weapon fired or otherwise used within or from a vehicle.
101 (19) Murder by the defendant where a court had issued a
102 protective order for the victim, against the defendant,
103 pursuant to Section 30-5-1 et seq.Chapter 5 of Title 30, or
104 the protective order was issued as a condition of the
105 defendant's pretrial release.
106 (20) Murder by the defendant in the presence of a child
107 under the age of 14 years of age at the time of the offense,
108 if the victim was the parent or legal guardian of the child.
109 For purposes of this subsection, "in the presence of a child"
110 means in the physical presence of a child or having knowledge
111 that a child is present and may see or hear the act.
112 (21) Murder when the victim is a first responder who is
Page 4

(21) Murder when the victim is a first responder who is
SB17 INTRODUCED
113 operating in an official capacity. For the purposes of this
114 subdivision, "first responder" includes emergency medical
115 services personnel licensed by the Alabama Department of
116 Public Health and firefighters and volunteer firefighters as
117 defined by Section 36-32-1.
118 (22) Rape in the first degree when the victim is less
119 than 12 years of age.
120 (23) Sodomy in the first degree when the victim is less
121 than 12 years of age.
122 (24) Sexual torture when the victim is less than 12
123 years of age.
124 (b) Except as specifically provided to the contrary in
125 the last part of subdivision (a)(13), the terms "murder" and
126 "murder by the defendant" as used in this section to define
127 capital offenses mean murder as defined in Section
128 13A-6-2(a)(1), but not as defined in Section 13A-6-2(a)(2) and
129 (3). Subject to the provisions of Section 13A-5-41, murder as
130 defined in Section 13A-6-2(a)(2) and (3), as well as murder as
131 defined in Section 13A-6-2(a)(1), may be a lesser included
132 offense of the capital offenses defined in subsection (a).
133 (c) A defendant who does not personally commit the act
134 of killing which constitutes the murder is not guilty of a
135 capital offense defined in subsection (a) unless that
136 defendant is legally accountable for the murder because of
137 complicity in the murder itself under the provisions of
138 Section 13A-2-23, in addition to being guilty of the other
139 elements of the capital offense as defined in subsection (a).
140 (d) To the extent that a crime other than murder is an
Page 5

(d) To the extent that a crime other than murder is an
SB17 INTRODUCED
141 element of a capital offense defined in subsection (a), a
142 defendant's guilt of that other crime may also be established
143 under Section 13A-2-23. When the defendant's guilt of that
144 other crime is established under Section 13A-2-23, that crime
145 shall be deemed to have been "committed by the defendant"
146 within the meaning of that phrase as it is used in subsection
147 (a)."
148 "§13A-6-61
149 (a) A person commits the crime of rape in the first
150 degree if he or she does any of the following:
151 (1) Engages in sexual intercourse with another person
152 by forcible compulsion.
153 (2) Engages in sexual intercourse with another person
154 who is incapable of consent by reason of being incapacitated.
155 (3) Being 16 years old of age or older, engages in
156 sexual intercourse with another person who is less than 12
157 years oldof age.
158 (b) Rape in the first degree is a Class A felony;
159 provided, that the punishment for a violation of subdivision
160 (a)(3) shall be as determined and fixed as provided in Article
161 2 of Chapter 5. Any defendant sentenced to life imprisonment
162 on a capital offense must serve a minimum of 30 years, day for
163 day, prior to his or her first consideration of parole."
164 "§13A-6-63
165 (a) A person commits the crime of sodomy in the first
166 degree if he or she does any of the following:
167 (1) Engages in sodomy with another person by forcible
168 compulsion.
Page 6

compulsion.
SB17 INTRODUCED
169 (2) Engages in sodomy with another person who is
170 incapable of consent by reason of being incapacitated.
171 (3) Being 16 years old of age or older, engages in
172 sodomy with a person who is less than 12 years oldof age.
173 (b) Sodomy in the first degree is a Class A felony;
174 provided, that the punishment for a violation of subdivision
175 (a)(3) shall be as determined and fixed as provided in Article
176 2 of Chapter 5. Any defendant sentenced to life imprisonment
177 on a capital offense must serve a minimum of 30 years, day for
178 day, prior to his or her first consideration of parole."
179 "§13A-6-65.1
180 (a) A person commits the crime of sexual torture if he
181 or she does any of the following:
182 (1) Penetrates the vagina, anus, or mouth of another
183 person with an inanimate object, by forcible compulsion, with
184 the intent to sexually torture, sexually abuse, or to gratify
185 the sexual desire of either party.
186 (2) Penetrates the vagina, anus, or mouth of a person
187 who is incapable of consent by reason of being incapacitated,
188 with an inanimate object, with the intent to sexually torture,
189 sexually abuse, or to gratify the sexual desire of either
190 party.
191 (3) Penetrates the vagina, anus, or mouth of a person
192 who is less than 12 years oldof age, with an inanimate object,
193 by a person who is 16 years old of age or older with the
194 intent to sexually torture, sexually abuse, or to gratify the
195 sexual desire of either party.
196 (4) By inflicting physical injury, including, but not
Page 7

(4) By inflicting physical injury, including, but not
SB17 INTRODUCED
197 limited to, burning, crushing, wounding, mutilating, or
198 assaulting the sex organs or intimate parts of another person,
199 with the intent to sexually torture, sexually abuse, or to
200 gratify the sexual desire of either party.
201 (b) The crime of sexual torture is a Class A felony;
202 provided, that the punishment for a violation of subdivision
203 (a)(3) shall be as determined and fixed as provided in Article
204 2 of Chapter 5. Any defendant sentenced to life imprisonment
205 on a capital offense must serve a minimum of 30 years, day for
206 day, prior to his or her first consideration of parole."
207 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
208 1, 2026.
Page 8